Utah statutes.
76-9-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Alien" means a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(2)  "ICE" means the federal Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency of the United States Department of Homeland Security.

(3)  "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in Section 53-13-103.

(4)  "SAVE program" means the federal Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements program operated by the federal Department of Homeland Security.

(5)  "State or local governmental agency" includes any private contractor or vendor that contracts with the agency to provide the agency's functions or services.

(6)  "Verify immigration status" or "verification of immigration status" means the determination of a person's immigration status by:

(a)  a law enforcement officer who is authorized by a federal agency to determine an alien's immigration status; or

(b)  the United States Department of Homeland Security, ICE, or other federal agency authorized to provide immigration status as provided by 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1373(c).

